Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. Community Facilities Grants.

Sec. 29.60.400.
Grants for community facilities.

Within the limits of appropriations for the purpose the department shall make matching grants in accordance with the provisions of AS

29.60.410

—

29.60.440

to municipalities or their nonprofit designees equal to

50 percent of the estimated reasonable costs of construction of municipal civic, convention, and community recreation centers; and

50 percent of the cost of feasibility studies relating to the construction of municipal civic, convention, and community recreation centers.

A grant may be made under this section only to a municipality with the power to implement the study or project for which the grant is authorized or to its nonprofit designee. A grant for only one study and one project may be awarded to a municipality or its designee under this section.

In this section, “costs of construction” means, in addition to costs directly related to a project, the sum of all costs of financing and carrying out the project, including the costs of all necessary studies, surveys, plans and specifications, architectural, engineering, or other special services, acquisition of real property, site preparation and development, purchase, construction, reconstruction, and improvement of real property and the acquisition of machinery and equipment necessary to the project; an allocable portion of the administrative and operating expenses of the grantee; and the cost of financing the project, including interest on bonds issued to finance the project, the cost of indemnity and surety bonds, premiums on insurance, legal fees, fees and expenses of trustees, depositaries, financial advisors, and the costs associated with the issuance of bonds. It does not include the cost of feasibility studies.

History.

(§ 16 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, to conform to the change in the definition of “department” made in AS

29.71.800

, reference to “the Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was replaced with a reference to “the department”.
The change is consistent with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 29.60.410.
Grant procedures.

An application for a grant under AS

29.60.400

shall be made in a form prescribed by the commissioner.

A grant shall be allotted in accordance with an agreement made between the commissioner on behalf of the state and the grantee. The agreement may include any provision agreed upon by the parties and must include in substance the following provisions:

estimates of reasonable costs of the study or project as approved by the commissioner after consultation with the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities;

a schedule of disbursements of money from the grant if the commissioner determines that the grant money is not to be disbursed in one sum;

agreement by the grantee

to proceed with and complete the proposed study or project expeditiously;

not to discontinue operation or dispose of all or part of a community facility for which it receives a grant without the approval of the commissioner;

to apply for and make reasonable efforts to secure federal assistance that may be available for the study or project, subject to any conditions the commissioner may require to maximize the amounts of that assistance available for all projects in the state;

to provide for payment of the grantee’s share of the cost of the study or project;

that, if federal assistance for a study or project becomes available to the grantee that was not included in the calculation of the amount of the grant, the value of the federal assistance shall be subtracted from the total value of the project and the balance shall be equally divided between the grantee and the state;

alteration or modification of an approved study or project;

alteration or modification of an existing facility that would have qualified for a grant at the time of initial construction if AS

29.60.400

—

29.60.440

had been in effect;

remedies in case of failure to perform the agreement or noncompliance with regulations adopted under AS

29.60.420

.

The commissioner shall require in negotiations and in each grant agreement that continued maintenance of the community facility is the responsibility of the municipality. The municipality must show the feasibility of continuing to maintain the facility before state money may be authorized for a grant.

History.

(§ 16 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, to conform to the change in the definition of “commissioner” made in AS

29.71.800

, reference to “the commissioner of commerce and economic development” was replaced with a reference to “the commissioner” in each subsection.
The changes are consistent with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 29.60.420.
Regulations.

[Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

The commissioner shall adopt regulations to carry out the purposes of AS

29.60.400

—

29.60.440

.

History.

(§ 16 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, to conform to the change in the definition of “commissioner” made in AS

29.71.800

, reference to “the commissioner of commerce and economic development” was replaced with a reference to “the commissioner”.
The change is consistent with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 29.60.430.
Allocation of money.

If the amount of money appropriated by the legislature for grants under AS

29.60.400

is not adequate to satisfy amounts required for approved grant applications, money shall be allocated on the basis of priority established by regulations of the department.

History.

(§ 16 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, to conform to the change in the definition of “department” made in AS

29.71.800

, reference to “the Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was replaced with a reference to “the department”.
The change is consistent with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 29.60.440.
Limitation.

AS

29.60.400

—

29.60.440

do not require that a recipient of a grant for a feasibility study must proceed with construction of the project, regardless of whether the project is determined to be feasible.

History.

(§ 16 ch 74 SLA 1985)